Maryland, session 2025, HB1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–908.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 14–301 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO:
(1) HAS CONSENT TO ENTER PROPERTY BY A PERSON WITH LEGAL
AUTHORITY TO GIVE THE CONSENT OR BY A PERSON WHO IS LAWFULLY PRESENT ON
THE PROPERTY; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1349*

HOUSE BILL 1349
(2) IS AUTHORIZED BY FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION TO OPERATE
AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM AND IS OPERATING THE UNMANNED AIRCRAFT
SYSTEM IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE LAW OR REGULATION.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND INTENTIONALLY CAUSE AN
UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM TO ENTER THE PROPERTY OF ANOTHER PERSON AND
COME WITHIN 50 FEET OF A DWELLING WITH THE INTENT TO:
(1) COERCE, INTIMIDATE, OR HARASS ANOTHER PERSON; OR
(2) OBTAIN VIDEOGRAPHIC OR PHOTOGRAPHIC IMAGES OF THE
PROPERTY, THE PROPERTY OWNER, A RESIDENT, OR A GUEST.
(D) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.